Utah, session 2026, HB567.
Section 1. Section 51-9-902 is amended to read:51-9-902Effective 05/06/26Superseded 07/01/26. Outdoor Adventure Infrastructure Restricted Account.(1)There is created within the General Fund a restricted account known as the "Outdoor Adventure Infrastructure Restricted Account."(2)The account shall consist of:(a)money deposited into the account under Subsection 59-12-103(15)59-12-103(14); and(b)interest and earnings on money in the account.(3)Subject to appropriation from the Legislature, money from the account shall be used for:(a)new construction of outdoor recreation infrastructure;(b)upgrades of outdoor recreation infrastructure;(c)the replacement of or structural improvements to outdoor recreation infrastructure;(d)the acquisition of land, a right-of-way, or easement used in relationship to outdoor recreation infrastructure; (e)providing access from state highways, as defined in Section 72-1-102, to outdoor recreation infrastructure;(f)the costs associated with bringing new construction or upgrades of outdoorrecreation infrastructure into environmental compliance;(g)strategic planning related to the development of outdoor recreation infrastructure;(h)facilitating avalanche safety forecasting to protect the public in relation to outdoor recreation infrastructure; or(i)clean up or security relating to outdoor recreation infrastructure.(4)For each fiscal year, beginning with fiscal year 2025-2026, the Division of Finance shall, subject to appropriation by the Legislature, distribute money from the Outdoor Adventure Infrastructure Restricted Account as follows:(a)at least 15% to the Department of Natural Resources - Division of State Parks - Capital, to be expended using the department's existing prioritization process for capital projects in state parks described in Subsection (3);(b)at least 22% to the Department of Natural Resources - Division of Outdoor Recreation - Capital, to be expended for competitive Recreation Restoration Infrastructure grants or Outdoor Recreational Infrastructure grants for outdoor recreation capital projects and related maintenance expenses, where maintenance expenses do not exceed 15% of the appropriation;(c)at least 53% to the Department of Natural Resources - Division of Outdoor Recreation - Capital, to be expended for larger outdoor recreation infrastructure projects described in Subsection (3) as recommended to the Legislature by the Outdoor Adventure Commission; and(d)at least 10% to the Utah Fairpark Area Investment and Restoration District created in Section 11-70-201 for the development and operation of the district.(5)If the Legislature appropriates money to the Department of Transportation from the account, the Transportation Commission, created in Section 72-1-301, shall prioritize projects and determine funding levels in accordance with Subsection 72-1-303(1)(a) based on recommendations of the Department of Transportation.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 79-8-102 is amended to read:79-8-102Effective 05/06/26. Definitions.As used in this chapter:(1)"Accessible to the general public" in relation to the awarding of an infrastructure grant, means:(a)the public may use the infrastructure in accordance with federal and state regulations; and(b)no community or group retains exclusive rights to access the infrastructure.(2)"Advisory committee" means the Utah Outdoor Recreation Infrastructure Advisory Committee created in Section 79-7-206.(3)"Children," in relation to the awarding of a UCORE grant, means individuals who are six years old or older and 18 years old or younger.(4)"Director" means the director of the Division of Outdoor Recreation.(5)"Division" means the Division of Outdoor Recreation.(6)"Executive director" means the executive director of the Department of Natural Resources.(7)"Infrastructure grant" means an outdoor recreational infrastructure grant described in Section 79-8-401.(8)(a)"Recreational infrastructure project" means an undertaking to build or, improve, or restore an approved facility or, installation, or natural feature needed for the public to access and enjoy the state's outdoors.(b)"Recreational infrastructure project" may include the:(i)establishment, construction, or renovation of a trail, trail infrastructure, or a trail facility;(ii)construction of a project or restoration of a waterbody for a water-related outdoor recreational activity;(iii)development of a project for a wildlife watching opportunity, including bird watching;(iv)development of a project that provides a winter recreation amenity;(v)construction or improvement of a community park that has an amenity for outdoor recreation; and(vi)construction or improvement of a naturalistic and accessible playground.(9)"UCORE grant" means a children's outdoor recreation and education grant described in Section 79-8-302.(10)(a)"Underserved community" means a group of people, including a municipality, county, or American Indian tribe, that is economically disadvantaged.(b)"Underserved community" includes an economically disadvantaged community where in relation to awarding a UCORE grant, the children of the community, including children with disabilities, have limited access to outdoor recreation or education programs.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 79-8-401 is amended to read:79-8-401Effective 05/06/26Repealed 01/01/28. Creation and purpose of infrastructure grant program.(1)There is created the Outdoor Recreational Infrastructure Grant Program administered by the division.(2)The division may seek to accomplish the following objectives in administering the infrastructure grant program:(a)build, maintain, and promote recreational infrastructure projects to provide greater access to low-cost outdoor recreation for the state's citizens;(b)encourage residents and nonresidents of the state to take advantage of the beauty of Utah's outdoors;(c)encourage individuals and businesses to relocate to the state;(d)promote outdoor exercise; and(e)provide outdoor recreational opportunities to an underserved community in the state.(3)The advisory committee shall advise and make recommendations to the division regarding infrastructure grants.

Section 4:
Section 4.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.